test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pess_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pess a-stem: # Noun 'rifle' - full paradigm
     pess+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: pess
     pess+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: peess
     pess+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: peess
     pess+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: pissu
     pess+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: peessast
     pess+N+Sg+Com+Indef: peessain
     pess+N+Ess+Indef: pessan
     pess+N+Par+Indef: pessad
     pess+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [peesstaa, peesstää]
     pess+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: peess
     pess+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: peessai
     pess+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: peessaid
     pess+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: peessaid
     pess+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: peessain
     pess+N+Pl+Com+Indef: peessaivuiʹm
     pess+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [peessaitaa, peessaitää]
     pess+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: piissuž
